Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.900

Application of chapter—Exceptions.

(1) This chapter shall apply only to persons who engage in the retail sale of merchandise in their regular course of business.

(2) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Persons acting in accordance with their powers and duties as public officers, such as county sheriffs;

(b) Bulk transfers as defined in *RCW 62A.6-102; or

(c) Moving sales, except for RCW 19.178.100(5).

(3) Going out of business sales of perishable merchandise or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, or water are exempt from the requirement that the notice of the sale be recorded at least fourteen days before the beginning date of the sale.

[ 1993 c 456 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 62A.6-102 was repealed by 1993 c 395 s 6-101.